Missouri, session 2026, SB1313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.405, to read as
follows:
442.405. 1. As used in this section, "homeowners'
association" or "association" shall mean a nonprofit
corporation or unincorporated association of homeowners
created under a declaration to own and operate portions of a
planned community or other residential subdivision that has
the power under the declaration to assess association
members to pay the costs and expenses incurred in the
performance of the association's obligations under the
declaration or tenants-in-common with respect to the
ownership of common ground or amenities of a planned
community or other residential subdivision. This term shall
not include a condominium unit owners' association as
defined and provided for in subdivision (3) of section 448.1-
103 or a residential cooperative.
2. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a homeowners' association shall dissolve ten years
following the date of establishment unless such association

SB 1313 2
is renewed by a majority vote of eighty-five percent of all
members of the association at an election held within ninety
days of the date of dissolution. Any association failing to
receive a majority vote of eighty-five percent for renewal
shall be immediately dissolved, and the member homeowners
shall not be subject to any other association for a period
of ten years unless approved by eighty-five percent of such
homeowners.
(2) Any association renewed pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection shall be subject to renewal every ten
years.
(3) Any association in existence for a period of at
least ten years as of August 28, 2026, shall hold an
election pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection no
later than December 31, 2026, and every ten years thereafter.
✓